Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
39A

SPECIAL
PURPOSE REVENUE BONDS

Part I. General Provisions

Section

39A-1 Statement on special purpose revenue bonds

39A-2 Public work project; issuance of special
purpose

revenue bonds; report to department of
labor and

industrial relations required

Part II. Assisting Not-for-Profit
Corporations that

Provide Health Care Facilities to
the

General Public

39A-31 Definitions

39A-32 Department powers as to health care
facilities

39A-33 Compliance with state and local law

39A-34 Conditions precedent to negotiating and
entering into

a project agreement

39A-35 Project agreement

39A-36 Issuance of special purpose revenue bonds
to finance

projects

39A-37 Authorization of special purpose revenue
bonds

39A-38 Special purpose revenue bond anticipation
notes

39A-39 Powers with respect to and security for
special

purpose revenue bonds

39A-40 Security for special purpose revenue bonds

39A-41 Special purpose revenue bonds not a
general obligation

of State

39A-42 Validity of special purpose revenue bonds

39A-43 Use of revenues derived from project
agreement

39A-44 Special purpose revenue bonds exempt from
taxation

39A-44.5 Federal tax exempt status

39A-45 Exemption from taxation of department
property

39A-46 Refunding special purpose revenue bonds

39A-47 Status of special purpose revenue bonds
under Uniform

Commercial Code

39A-48 Special purpose revenue bonds as legal
investments and

lawful security

39A-49 Access to and public disclosure of
financial records

of project party

39A-50 Estimate of benefits

39A-51 Construction of this part

39A-52 Repealed

Part III. Assisting Manufacturing
Enterprises

39A-71 Definitions

39A-72 Department powers as to manufacturing
enterprises

39A-73 Compliance with state and local law

39A-74 Conditions precedent to negotiating and
entering into

a project agreement

39A-75 Project agreement

39A-76 Issuance of special purpose revenue bonds
to finance

projects

39A-77 Authorization of special purpose revenue
bonds

39A-78 Special purpose revenue bond anticipation
notes

39A-79 Powers with respect to and security for
special

purpose revenue bonds

39A-80 Security for special purpose revenue bonds

39A-81 Special purpose revenue bonds not a
general obligation

of State

39A-82 Validity of special purpose revenue bonds

39A-83 Use of revenues derived from project
agreement

39A-84 Special purpose revenue bonds exempt from
taxation

39A-84.5 Federal tax exempt status

39A-85 Exemption from taxation of department
property

39A-86 Refunding special purpose revenue bonds

39A-87 Status of special purpose revenue bonds
under Uniform

Commercial Code

39A-88 Special purpose revenue bonds as legal
investments and

lawful security

39A-89 Access to and public disclosure of
financial records

of project party

39A-90 Estimate of benefits

39A-91 Construction of this part

Part IV. Assisting Processing Enterprises

39A-111 Definitions

39A-112 Department powers as to processing
enterprises

39A-113 Compliance with state and local law

39A-114 Conditions precedent to negotiating and
entering into

a project agreement

39A-115 Project agreement

39A-116 Issuance of special purpose revenue bonds
to finance

projects

39A-117 Authorization of special purpose revenue
bonds

39A-118 Special purpose revenue bond anticipation
notes

39A-119 Powers with respect to and security for
special

purpose revenue bonds

39A-120 Security for special purpose revenue bonds

39A-121 Special purpose revenue bonds not a
general obligation

of State

39A-122 Validity of special purpose revenue bonds

39A-123 Use of revenues derived from project
agreement

39A-124 Special purpose revenue bonds exempt from
taxation

39A-124.5 Federal tax exempt status

39A-125 Exemption from taxation of department
property

39A-126 Refunding special purpose revenue bonds

39A-127 Status of special purpose revenue bonds
under Uniform

Commercial Code

39A-128 Special purpose revenue bonds as legal
investments and

lawful security

39A-129 Access to and public disclosure of
financial records

of project party

39A-130 Estimate of benefits

39A-131 Construction of this part

Part V. Assisting Industrial Enterprises

39A-151 Definitions

39A-152 Department powers as to industrial
enterprises

39A-153 Compliance with state and local law

39A-154 Conditions precedent to negotiating and
entering into

a project agreement

39A-155 Project agreement

39A-156 Issuance of special purpose revenue bonds
to finance

projects

39A-157 Authorization of special purpose revenue
bonds

39A-158 Special purpose revenue bond anticipation
notes

39A-159 Powers with respect to and security for
special

purpose revenue bonds

39A-160 Security for special purpose revenue bonds

39A-161 Special purpose revenue bonds not a
general obligation

of State

39A-162 Validity of special purpose revenue bonds

39A-163 Use of revenues derived from project
agreement

39A-164 Special purpose revenue bonds exempt from
taxation

39A-164.5 Federal tax exempt status

39A-165 Exemption from taxation of department
property

39A-166 Refunding special purpose revenue bonds

39A-167 Status of special purpose revenue bonds under
the

Uniform Commercial Code

39A-168 Special purpose revenue bonds as legal
investments and

lawful security

39A-169 Access to and public disclosure of
financial records

of project party

39A-170 Estimate of benefits

39A-171 Construction of this part

Part VI. Assisting Utilities Serving the
General Public

in
Providing Electric Energy, Gas, or

Telecommunications

39A-191 Definitions

39A-192 Department powers as to projects

39A-193 Compliance with state and local law

39A-194 Conditions precedent to negotiating and
entering into

a project agreement

39A-195 Project agreement

39A-196 Issuance of special purpose revenue bonds
to finance

projects

39A-197 Authorization of special purpose revenue
bonds

39A-198 Special purpose revenue bond anticipation
notes

39A-199 Powers with respect to and security for
special

purpose revenue bonds

39A-200 Security for special purpose revenue bonds

39A-201 Special purpose revenue bonds not a
general obligation

of the State

39A-202 Validity of special purpose revenue bonds

39A-203 Use of revenues derived from project
agreement

39A-204 Special purpose revenue bonds exempt from
taxation

39A-204.5 Federal tax exempt status

39A-205 Exemption from taxation of department
property

39A-206 Refunding special purpose revenue bonds

39A-207 Status of special purpose revenue bonds
under Uniform

Commercial Code

39A-208 Treatment of special purpose revenue bonds
in

regulatory proceedings

39A-209 Special purpose revenue bonds as legal
investments

and lawful security

39A-210 Construction of this part

39A-211 Repealed

Part VII. Assisting Not-for-Profit
Corporations

That Provide Early Childhood
Education and

Care Facilities Serving the
General Public

39A-221 Definitions

39A-222 Department powers as to early childhood
education and

care facilities

39A-223 Compliance with state and local law

39A-224 Conditions precedent to negotiating and
entering into

a project agreement

39A-225 Project agreement

39A-226 Issuance of special purpose revenue bonds
to finance

projects

39A-227 Authorization of special purpose revenue
bonds

39A-228 Special purpose revenue bond anticipation
notes

39A-229 Powers with respect to and security for
special

purpose revenue bonds

39A-230 Security for special purpose revenue bonds

39A-231 Special purpose revenue bonds not a
general obligation

of the State

39A-232 Validity of special purpose revenue bonds

39A-233 Use of revenues derived from project
agreement

39A-234 Special purpose revenue bonds exempt from
taxation

39A-235 Exemption from taxation of department
property

39A-236 Refunding special purpose revenue bonds

39A-237 Status of special purpose revenue bonds
under Uniform

Commercial Code

39A-238 Special purpose revenue bonds as legal
investments and

lawful security

39A-239 Access to and public disclosure of
financial records

of project party

39A-240 Estimate of benefits

39A-241 Construction of this part

39A-242 Sunset provision

Part VIII. Assisting Not-for-Profit Private
Nonsectarian

and Sectarian Elementary Schools, Secondary

Schools, Colleges, and
Universities Serving

the General Public

39A-251 Definitions

39A-252 Department powers as to private
nonsectarian and

sectarian elementary schools, secondary
schools,

colleges, and universities

39A-253 Compliance with state and local law

39A-254 Conditions precedent to negotiating and
entering into a

project agreement

39A-255 Project agreement

39A-256 Issuance of special purpose revenue bonds
to finance

projects

39A-257 Authorization of special purpose revenue
bonds

39A-258 Special purpose revenue bond anticipation
notes

39A-259 Powers with respect to and security for special
purpose

revenue bonds

39A-260 Security for special purpose revenue bonds

39A-261 Special purpose revenue bonds not a
general obligation

of the State

39A-262 Validity of special purpose revenue bonds

39A-263 Use of revenues derived from project
agreement

39A-264 Special purpose revenue bonds exempt from
taxation

39A-265 Federal tax-exempt status

39A-266 Exemption from taxation of department
property

39A-267 Refunding special purpose revenue bonds

39A-268 Status of special purpose revenue bonds
under Uniform

Commercial Code

39A-269 Special purpose revenue bonds as legal
investments and

lawful security

39A-270 Access to and public disclosure of
financial records

of project party

39A-271 Estimate of benefits

39A-272 Construction of this part

Part IX. Assisting Not-for-Profit Private
Organizations,

For-Profit Private Organizations, and
Public

Instrumentalities and their
Qualified

Affiliates in the Development of
Low- and

Moderate-Income Housing

39A-281 Definitions

39A-282 Department powers in the development of
low- and

moderate-income housing

39A-283 Compliance with state and local law

39A-284 Conditions precedent to negotiating and
entering into

a project agreement

39A-285 Project agreement

39A-286 Issuance of special purpose revenue bonds
to finance

projects

39A-287 Authorization of special purpose revenue bonds

39A-288 Special purpose revenue bond anticipation notes

39A-289 Powers with respect to and security for special

purpose revenue bonds

39A-290 Security for special purpose revenue bonds

39A-291 Special purpose revenue bonds not a
general obligation

of the State

39A-292 Validity of special purpose revenue bonds

39A-293 Use of revenues derived from project
agreement

39A-294 Special purpose revenue bonds exempt from
taxation

39A-295 Federal tax-exempt status

39A-296 Exemption from taxation of department
property

39A-297 Refunding special purpose revenue bonds

39A-298 Status of special purpose revenue bonds
under Uniform

Commercial Code

39A-299 Special purpose revenue bonds as legal
investments and

lawful security

39A-300 Access to and public disclosure of
financial records

of project party

39A-301 Estimate of benefits

39A-302 Construction of this part

Part X. Assisting Agricultural Enterprises

39A-311 Definitions

39A-312 Department powers as to agricultural
enterprises

39A-313 Compliance with state and local law

39A-314 Conditions precedent to negotiating and
entering

into a project agreement

39A-315 Project agreement

39A-316 Issuance of special purpose revenue bonds
to

finance projects

39A-317 Authorization of special purpose revenue
bonds

39A-318 Special purpose revenue bond anticipation
notes

39A-319 Powers with respect to and security for
special

purpose revenue bonds

39A-320 Security for special purpose revenue bonds

39A-321 Special purpose revenue bonds not a
general

obligation of the State

39A-322 Validity of special purpose revenue bonds

39A-323 Use of revenues derived from project
agreement

39A-324 Special purpose revenue bonds exempt from
taxation

39A-325 Federal tax exempt status

39A-326 Exemption from taxation of department
property

39A-327 Refunding special purpose revenue bonds

39A-328 Status of special purpose revenue bonds
under the

Uniform Commercial Code

39A-329 Special purpose revenue bonds as legal
investments

and lawful security

39A-330 Access to and public disclosure of
financial records

of project party

39A-331 Estimate of benefits

39A-332 Construction of this part

Part XII. Assisting Dam and Reservoir
Owners

39A-341 Definitions

39A-342 Department powers as to dam and reservoir
owners

39A-343 Compliance with state and local law

39A-344 Conditions precedent to negotiating and
entering into a

project agreement

39A-345 Project agreement

39A-346 Issuance of special purpose revenue bonds
to finance

projects

39A-347 Authorization of special purpose revenue
bonds

39A-348 Special purpose revenue bond anticipation
notes

39A-349 Powers with respect to and security for
special purpose

revenue bonds

39A-350 Security for special purpose revenue bonds

39A-351 Special purpose revenue bonds not a
general obligation

of the State

39A-352 Validity of special purpose revenue bonds

39A-353 Use of revenues derived from project
agreement

39A-354 Special purpose revenue bonds exempt from
taxation

39A-355 Federal tax exempt status

39A-356 Exemption from taxation of department
property

39A-357 Refunding special purpose revenue bonds

39A-358 Status of special purpose revenue bonds
under the

Uniform Commercial Code

39A-359 Special purpose revenue bonds as legal
investments and

lawful security

39A-360 Access to and public disclosure of financial
records of

project party

39A-361 Estimate of benefits

39A-362 Construction of this part

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next